District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

47-1228

Periods of limitation on audit and collection

Expired.

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 9-214

Section 15(a) of D.C. Law 9-214 provided that the act shall expire on September 30, 1994. Section 15(b) of D.C. Law 9-214 provided that after the expiration of the act all rights and liabilities arising under the act prior to its expiration shall continue and may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as if the act were still in effect.